Georgia, session 2025_26, HB428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Millions of Americans and Georgians have struggled to have children;
(2) In vitro fertilization is a safe, effective, and legal way to make the dream of having
children possible for many of those individuals;
(3) Many members of this legislative body have received inquiries from the public
regarding the legal status of this procedure; and
(4) Such uncertainty needs to be addressed through legislation confirming that nothing
in Georgia law prohibits or prevents an individual from obtaining in vitro fertilization in
this state.
- 1 -

LC 33 9818S
SECTION 2.
Chapter 1 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions regarding health, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"31-1-26.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'in vitro fertilization' means a type of fertility
treatment in which oocytes are removed from a female's ovary and, in an embryology
laboratory, fertilized with a male's sperm to form one or more embryos that begin
development in such laboratory and are subsequently transferred to a female's uterus or
preserved for future use.
(b) Nothing in this Code shall be construed to prohibit or prevent an individual from
obtaining in vitro fertilization in this state."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 2 -